Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-42] Relation to Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This chapter modifies,
limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act, title 15 United States Code section 7001, et seq., but does not
modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act, title 15 United States
Code section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in section 103(b) of that Act, title 15 United States Code section
7003(b). [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Note

Section applies to proceedings begun before September 1,
2014, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been
issued. L 2012, c 236, §2.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next